District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.51

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“CFO” means the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia.

(2)

“Director of Capital Programs” means the Director of Capital Programs within the Office of Budget and Planning of the Office of the Chief Financial Officer.

(3)

“Inactive” means that no nonpersonal service funds have been obligated or expended for a capital project during the immediately preceding months.

(4)

“Local Streets Ward-Based Capital Projects” means the District Department of Transportation’s 8 local streets ward-based capital projects (Project No. SR301-SR308), which endeavor to preserve, maintain, repair, or replace the District’s sidewalks, curbs, and local roads.

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11h [11i]
as added Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 9002, 59 DCR 8025
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added this section.

D.C. Law 19-168, § 9002, added Title IV, consisting of §§ 11h to 11k, to D.C. Law 14-137.

Section 11h of D.C. Law 14-137, as added by D.C. Law 19-168, § 9002, is codified as this section.

Section 11h of D.C. Law 14-137, as added May 27, 2010, by D.C. Law 18-182, § 2(b), 57 DCR 3404, is codified as § 50-921.38.